Utah statutes.
63G-6a-406.   Public notice of procurement process or sole source procurement.

(1)  The division or a procurement unit with independent procurement authority that issues an invitation for bids, a request for proposals, or a notice of sole source procurement required to be published in accordance with this section, shall provide public notice that includes:

(a)  for an invitation for bids or a request for proposals, the name of the issuing procurement unit;

(b)  the name of the procurement unit acquiring the procurement item;

(c)  for an invitation for bids or a request for proposals, information on how to contact the issuing procurement unit in relation to the invitation for bids or request for proposals;

(d)  for a notice of sole source procurement, contact information and other information relating to contesting, or obtaining additional information in relation to, the sole source procurement;

(e)  for an invitation for bids or a request for proposals, the date of the opening and closing of the invitation for bids or request for proposals;

(f)  for a notice of sole source procurement, the earliest date that the procurement unit may make the sole source procurement;

(g)  information on how to obtain a copy of the invitation for bids, request for proposals, or further information related to the sole source procurement; and

(h)  a general description of the procurement items that will be obtained through the standard procurement process or sole source procurement.

(2)  Except as provided in Subsection (4), for an invitation for bids or a request for proposals, the issuing procurement unit shall publish the notice described in Subsection (1), using at least one of the following methods:

(a)  at least seven days before the day of the deadline for submission of a bid or other response, publish the notice:

(i)  in a newspaper of general circulation in the state; or

(ii)  in a newspaper of local circulation in the area:

(A)  directly impacted by the procurement; or

(B)  over which the procurement unit has jurisdiction; or

(b)  at least seven consecutive days before the day of the deadline for submission of a bid or other response, publish the notice:

(i)  on the main website for the issuing procurement unit or the procurement unit acquiring the procurement item; or

(ii)  on a state website that is owned, managed by, or provided under contract with, the division for posting a public procurement notice.

(3)  Except as provided in Subsection (4), for a sole source procurement for which notice is required to be published in accordance with this section, the procurement unit making the sole source procurement shall publish the notice described in Subsection (1), using at least one of the following methods:

(a)  at least seven days before the day on which the procurement unit makes the sole source procurement, publish the notice:

(i)  in a newspaper of general circulation in the state; or

(ii)  in a newspaper of local circulation in the area:

(A)  directly impacted by the procurement; or

(B)  over which the procurement unit has jurisdiction; or

(b)  at least seven consecutive days before the day on which the procurement unit makes the sole source procurement, publish the notice:

(i)  on the main website for the procurement unit acquiring the procurement item; or

(ii)  on a state website that is owned by, managed by, or provided under contract with, the division for posting a procurement notice.

(4)  An issuing procurement unit, or the procurement unit making a sole source procurement may reduce the seven-day period described in Subsection (2) or (3), if the procurement officer or the procurement officer's designee signs a written statement that:

(a)  states that a shorter time is needed; and

(b)  as it relates to an invitation for bids or a request for proposals, determines that competition from multiple sources may be obtained within the shorter period of time.

(5) (a)  An issuing procurement unit shall make a copy of an invitation for bids or a request for proposals available for public inspection at the main office of the issuing procurement unit or on the website described in Subsection (2)(b).

(b)  A procurement unit making a sole source procurement shall make a copy of information related to the sole source procurement available for public inspection at the main office of the procurement unit or on the website described in Subsection (3)(b).



Amended by Chapter 445, 2013 General Session

